Illinois, session 104th, SB1406.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Use Tax Act is amended by changing Section 53-61 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 105/3-61)7    Sec. 3-61. Motor vehicles; trailers; use as rolling stock 8definition. 9    (a) (Blank). 10    (b) (Blank).11    (c) This subsection (c) applies to motor vehicles, other 12than limousines, purchased through June 30, 2017. For motor 13vehicles, other than limousines, purchased on or after July 1, 142017, subsection (d-5) applies. This subsection (c) applies to 15limousines purchased before, on, or after July 1, 2017. "Use 16as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce" in paragraph 17(c) of Section 3-55 occurs for motor vehicles, as defined in 18Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, when during a 1912-month period the rolling stock has carried persons or 20property for hire in interstate commerce for greater than 50% 21of its total trips for that period or for greater than 50% of 22its total miles for that period. The person claiming the 23exemption shall make an election at the time of purchase to use   SB1406- 2 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1either the trips or mileage method. Persons who purchased 2motor vehicles prior to July 1, 2004 shall make an election to 3use either the trips or mileage method and document that 4election in their books and records. If no election is made 5under this subsection to use the trips or mileage method, the 6person shall be deemed to have chosen the mileage method.7    For purposes of determining qualifying trips or miles, 8motor vehicles that carry persons or property for hire, even 9just between points in Illinois, will be considered used for 10hire in interstate commerce if the motor vehicle transports 11persons whose journeys or property whose shipments originate 12or terminate outside Illinois. The exemption for motor 13vehicles used as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce 14may be claimed only for the following vehicles: (i) motor 15vehicles whose gross vehicle weight rating exceeds 16,000 16pounds; and (ii) limousines, as defined in Section 1-139.1 of 17the Illinois Vehicle Code. Through June 30, 2017, this 18definition applies to all property purchased for the purpose 19of being attached to those motor vehicles as a part thereof. On 20and after July 1, 2017, this definition applies to property 21purchased for the purpose of being attached to limousines as a 22part thereof. 23    (d) For purchases made through June 30, 2017, "use as 24rolling stock moving in interstate commerce" in paragraph (c) 25of Section 3-55 occurs for trailers, as defined in Section 261-209 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, semitrailers as defined in   SB1406- 3 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1Section 1-187 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, and pole trailers 2as defined in Section 1-161 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, when 3during a 12-month period the rolling stock has carried persons 4or property for hire in interstate commerce for greater than 550% of its total trips for that period or for greater than 50% 6of its total miles for that period. The person claiming the 7exemption for a trailer or trailers that will not be dedicated 8to a motor vehicle or group of motor vehicles shall make an 9election at the time of purchase to use either the trips or 10mileage method. Persons who purchased trailers prior to July 111, 2004 that are not dedicated to a motor vehicle or group of 12motor vehicles shall make an election to use either the trips 13or mileage method and document that election in their books 14and records. If no election is made under this subsection to 15use the trips or mileage method, the person shall be deemed to 16have chosen the mileage method.17    For purposes of determining qualifying trips or miles, 18trailers, semitrailers, or pole trailers that carry property 19for hire, even just between points in Illinois, will be 20considered used for hire in interstate commerce if the 21trailers, semitrailers, or pole trailers transport property 22whose shipments originate or terminate outside Illinois. This 23definition applies to all property purchased for the purpose 24of being attached to those trailers, semitrailers, or pole 25trailers as a part thereof. In lieu of a person providing 26documentation regarding the qualifying use of each individual   SB1406- 4 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer, that person may 2document such qualifying use by providing documentation of the 3following:4        (1) If a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer is 5    dedicated to a motor vehicle that qualifies as rolling 6    stock moving in interstate commerce under subsection (c) 7    of this Section, then that trailer, semitrailer, or pole 8    trailer qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate 9    commerce under this subsection.10        (2) If a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer is 11    dedicated to a group of motor vehicles that all qualify as 12    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce under 13    subsection (c) of this Section, then that trailer, 14    semitrailer, or pole trailer qualifies as rolling stock 15    moving in interstate commerce under this subsection.16        (3) If one or more trailers, semitrailers, or pole 17    trailers are dedicated to a group of motor vehicles and 18    not all of those motor vehicles in that group qualify as 19    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce under 20    subsection (c) of this Section, then the percentage of 21    those trailers, semitrailers, or pole trailers that 22    qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce 23    under this subsection is equal to the percentage of those 24    motor vehicles in that group that qualify as rolling stock 25    moving in interstate commerce under subsection (c) of this 26    Section to which those trailers, semitrailers, or pole   SB1406- 5 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1    trailers are dedicated. However, to determine the 2    qualification for the exemption provided under this item 3    (3), the mathematical application of the qualifying 4    percentage to one or more trailers, semitrailers, or pole 5    trailers under this subpart shall not be allowed as to any 6    fraction of a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer. 7    (d-5) For motor vehicles and trailers purchased on or 8after July 1, 2017, "use as rolling stock moving in interstate 9commerce" means that:10        (1) the motor vehicle or trailer is used to transport 11    persons or property for hire;12        (2) for purposes of the exemption under subsection (c) 13    of Section 3-55, the purchaser who is an owner, lessor, or 14    shipper claiming the exemption certifies that the motor 15    vehicle or trailer will be utilized, from the time of 16    purchase and continuing through the statute of limitations 17    for issuing a notice of tax liability under this Act, by an 18    interstate carrier or carriers for hire who hold, and are 19    required by Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration 20    regulations to hold, an active USDOT Number with the 21    Carrier Operation listed as "Interstate" and the Operation 22    Classification listed as "authorized for hire", "exempt 23    for hire", or both "authorized for hire" and "exempt for 24    hire"; except that this paragraph (2) does not apply to a 25    motor vehicle or trailer used at an airport to support the 26    operation of an aircraft moving in interstate commerce, as   SB1406- 6 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1    long as (i) in the case of a motor vehicle, the motor 2    vehicle meets paragraphs (1) and (3) of this subsection 3    (d-5) or (ii) in the case of a trailer, the trailer meets 4    paragraph (1) of this subsection (d-5); and5        (3) for motor vehicles, the gross vehicle weight 6    rating exceeds 16,000 pounds.7    The definition of "use as rolling stock moving in 8interstate commerce" in this subsection (d-5) applies to all 9property purchased on or after July 1, 2017 for the purpose of 10being attached to a motor vehicle or trailer as a part thereof, 11regardless of whether the motor vehicle or trailer was 12purchased before, on, or after July 1, 2017.13    If an item ceases to meet requirements (1) through (3) 14under this subsection (d-5), then the tax is imposed on the 15selling price, allowing for a reasonable depreciation for the 16period during which the item qualified for the exemption.17    For purposes of this subsection (d-5):18        "Motor vehicle" excludes limousines, but otherwise 19    means that term as defined in Section 1-146 of the 20    Illinois Vehicle Code.21        "Trailer" means (i) "trailer", as defined in Section 22    1-209 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, (ii) "semitrailer", as 23    defined in Section 1-187 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, and 24    (iii) "pole trailer", as defined in Section 1-161 of the 25    Illinois Vehicle Code. 26    (e) For aircraft purchased on or after January 1, 2014 and   SB1406- 7 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1purchased before January 1, 2025 and for watercraft purchased 2on or after January 1, 2014, "use as rolling stock moving in 3interstate commerce" in paragraph (c) of Section 3-55 occurs 4when, during a 12-month period, the rolling stock has carried 5persons or property for hire in interstate commerce for 6greater than 50% of its total trips for that period or for 7greater than 50% of its total miles for that period. For 8aircraft purchased on or after January 1, 2025, "use as 9rolling stock moving in interstate commerce" in paragraph (c) 10of Section 3-55 occurs when, during a 24-month period, the 11rolling stock has carried persons or property for hire in 12interstate commerce for more than 50% of its total trips for 13that period or for more than 50% of its total miles for that 14period. The person claiming the exemption shall make an 15election at the time of purchase to use either the trips or 16mileage method and document that election in their books and 17records. If no election is made under this subsection to use 18the trips or mileage method, the person shall be deemed to have 19chosen the mileage method. For aircraft, flight hours may be 20used in lieu of recording miles in determining whether the 21aircraft meets the mileage test in this subsection. For 22watercraft, nautical miles or trip hours may be used in lieu of 23recording miles in determining whether the watercraft meets 24the mileage test in this subsection.25    Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 26contrary, property purchased on or after January 1, 2014 for   SB1406- 8 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1the purpose of being attached to aircraft or watercraft as a 2part thereof qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate 3commerce only if the aircraft or watercraft to which it will be 4attached qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate 5commerce under the test set forth in this subsection (e), 6regardless of when the aircraft or watercraft was purchased. 7Persons who purchased aircraft or watercraft prior to January 81, 2014 shall make an election to use either the trips or 9mileage method and document that election in their books and 10records for the purpose of determining whether property 11purchased on or after January 1, 2014 for the purpose of being 12attached to aircraft or watercraft as a part thereof qualifies 13as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce under this 14subsection (e). 15    (f) The election to use either the trips or mileage method 16made under the provisions of subsections (c), (d), or (e) of 17this Section will remain in effect for the duration of the 18purchaser's ownership of that item. 19(Source: P.A. 100-321, eff. 8-24-17.) 20    Section 10. The Service Use Tax Act is amended by changing 21Section 3-51 as follows: 22    (35 ILCS 110/3-51)23    Sec. 3-51. Motor vehicles; trailers; use as rolling stock 24definition.   SB1406- 9 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1    (a) (Blank). 2    (b) (Blank).3    (c) This subsection (c) applies to motor vehicles, other 4than limousines, purchased through June 30, 2017. For motor 5vehicles, other than limousines, purchased on or after July 1, 62017, subsection (d-5) applies. This subsection (c) applies to 7limousines purchased before, on, or after July 1, 2017. "Use 8as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce" in paragraph 9(4a) of the definition of "sale of service" in Section 2 and 10subsection (b) of Section 3-45 occurs for motor vehicles, as 11defined in Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, when 12during a 12-month period the rolling stock has carried persons 13or property for hire in interstate commerce for greater than 1450% of its total trips for that period or for greater than 50% 15of its total miles for that period. The person claiming the 16exemption shall make an election at the time of purchase to use 17either the trips or mileage method. Persons who purchased 18motor vehicles prior to July 1, 2004 shall make an election to 19use either the trips or mileage method and document that 20election in their books and records. If no election is made 21under this subsection to use the trips or mileage method, the 22person shall be deemed to have chosen the mileage method.23    For purposes of determining qualifying trips or miles, 24motor vehicles that carry persons or property for hire, even 25just between points in Illinois, will be considered used for 26hire in interstate commerce if the motor vehicle transports   SB1406- 10 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1persons whose journeys or property whose shipments originate 2or terminate outside Illinois. The exemption for motor 3vehicles used as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce 4may be claimed only for the following vehicles: (i) motor 5vehicles whose gross vehicle weight rating exceeds 16,000 6pounds; and (ii) limousines, as defined in Section 1-139.1 of 7the Illinois Vehicle Code. Through June 30, 2017, this 8definition applies to all property purchased for the purpose 9of being attached to those motor vehicles as a part thereof. On 10and after July 1, 2017, this definition applies to property 11purchased for the purpose of being attached to limousines as a 12part thereof. 13    (d) For purchases made through June 30, 2017, "use as 14rolling stock moving in interstate commerce" in paragraph (4a) 15of the definition of "sale of service" in Section 2 and 16subsection (b) of Section 3-45 occurs for trailers, as defined 17in Section 1-209 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, semitrailers as 18defined in Section 1-187 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, and 19pole trailers as defined in Section 1-161 of the Illinois 20Vehicle Code, when during a 12-month period the rolling stock 21has carried persons or property for hire in interstate 22commerce for greater than 50% of its total trips for that 23period or for greater than 50% of its total miles for that 24period. The person claiming the exemption for a trailer or 25trailers that will not be dedicated to a motor vehicle or group 26of motor vehicles shall make an election at the time of   SB1406- 11 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1purchase to use either the trips or mileage method. Persons 2who purchased trailers prior to July 1, 2004 that are not 3dedicated to a motor vehicle or group of motor vehicles shall 4make an election to use either the trips or mileage method and 5document that election in their books and records. If no 6election is made under this subsection to use the trips or 7mileage method, the person shall be deemed to have chosen the 8mileage method.9    For purposes of determining qualifying trips or miles, 10trailers, semitrailers, or pole trailers that carry property 11for hire, even just between points in Illinois, will be 12considered used for hire in interstate commerce if the 13trailers, semitrailers, or pole trailers transport property 14whose shipments originate or terminate outside Illinois. This 15definition applies to all property purchased for the purpose 16of being attached to those trailers, semitrailers, or pole 17trailers as a part thereof. In lieu of a person providing 18documentation regarding the qualifying use of each individual 19trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer, that person may 20document such qualifying use by providing documentation of the 21following:22        (1) If a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer is 23    dedicated to a motor vehicle that qualifies as rolling 24    stock moving in interstate commerce under subsection (c) 25    of this Section, then that trailer, semitrailer, or pole 26    trailer qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate   SB1406- 12 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1    commerce under this subsection.2        (2) If a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer is 3    dedicated to a group of motor vehicles that all qualify as 4    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce under 5    subsection (c) of this Section, then that trailer, 6    semitrailer, or pole trailer qualifies as rolling stock 7    moving in interstate commerce under this subsection.8        (3) If one or more trailers, semitrailers, or pole 9    trailers are dedicated to a group of motor vehicles and 10    not all of those motor vehicles in that group qualify as 11    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce under 12    subsection (c) of this Section, then the percentage of 13    those trailers, semitrailers, or pole trailers that 14    qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce 15    under this subsection is equal to the percentage of those 16    motor vehicles in that group that qualify as rolling stock 17    moving in interstate commerce under subsection (c) of this 18    Section to which those trailers, semitrailers, or pole 19    trailers are dedicated. However, to determine the 20    qualification for the exemption provided under this item 21    (3), the mathematical application of the qualifying 22    percentage to one or more trailers, semitrailers, or pole 23    trailers under this subpart shall not be allowed as to any 24    fraction of a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer. 25    (d-5) For motor vehicles and trailers purchased on or 26after July 1, 2017, "use as rolling stock moving in interstate   SB1406- 13 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1commerce" means that:2        (1) the motor vehicle or trailer is used to transport 3    persons or property for hire;4        (2) for purposes of the exemption under paragraph (4a) 5    of the definition of "sale of service" in Section 2, the 6    purchaser who is an owner, lessor, or shipper claiming the 7    exemption certifies that the motor vehicle or trailer will 8    be utilized, from the time of purchase and continuing 9    through the statute of limitations for issuing a notice of 10    tax liability under this Act, by an interstate carrier or 11    carriers for hire who hold, and are required by Federal 12    Motor Carrier Safety Administration regulations to hold, 13    an active USDOT Number with the Carrier Operation listed 14    as "Interstate" and the Operation Classification listed as 15    "authorized for hire", "exempt for hire", or both 16    "authorized for hire" and "exempt for hire"; except that 17    this paragraph (2) does not apply to a motor vehicle or 18    trailer used at an airport to support the operation of an 19    aircraft moving in interstate commerce, as long as (i) in 20    the case of a motor vehicle, the motor vehicle meets 21    paragraphs (1) and (3) of this subsection (d-5) or (ii) in 22    the case of a trailer, the trailer meets paragraph (1) of 23    this subsection (d-5); and24        (3) for motor vehicles, the gross vehicle weight 25    rating exceeds 16,000 pounds.26    The definition of "use as rolling stock moving in   SB1406- 14 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1interstate commerce" in this subsection (d-5) applies to all 2property purchased on or after July 1, 2017 for the purpose of 3being attached to a motor vehicle or trailer as a part thereof, 4regardless of whether the motor vehicle or trailer was 5purchased before, on, or after July 1, 2017.6    If an item ceases to meet requirements (1) through (3) 7under this subsection (d-5), then the tax is imposed on the 8selling price, allowing for a reasonable depreciation for the 9period during which the item qualified for the exemption.10    For purposes of this subsection (d-5):11        "Motor vehicle" excludes limousines, but otherwise 12    means that term as defined in Section 1-146 of the 13    Illinois Vehicle Code.14        "Trailer" means (i) "trailer", as defined in Section 15    1-209 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, (ii) "semitrailer", as 16    defined in Section 1-187 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, and 17    (iii) "pole trailer", as defined in Section 1-161 of the 18    Illinois Vehicle Code. 19    (e) For aircraft purchased on or after January 1, 2014 and 20purchased before January 1, 2025 and for watercraft purchased 21on or after January 1, 2014, "use as rolling stock moving in 22interstate commerce" in (i) paragraph (4a) of the definition 23of "sale of service" in Section 2 and (ii) subsection (b) of 24Section 3-45 occurs when, during a 12-month period, the 25rolling stock has carried persons or property for hire in 26interstate commerce for greater than 50% of its total trips   SB1406- 15 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1for that period or for greater than 50% of its total miles for 2that period. For aircraft purchased on or after January 1, 32025, "use as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce" in 4(i) paragraph (4a) of the definition of "sale of service" in 5Section 2 and (ii) subsection (b) of Section 3-45 occurs when, 6during a 24-month period, the rolling stock has carried 7persons or property for hire in interstate commerce for more 8than 50% of its total trips for that period or for more than 950% of its total miles for that period. The person claiming the 10exemption shall make an election at the time of purchase to use 11either the trips or mileage method and document that election 12in their books and records. If no election is made under this 13subsection to use the trips or mileage method, the person 14shall be deemed to have chosen the mileage method. For 15aircraft, flight hours may be used in lieu of recording miles 16in determining whether the aircraft meets the mileage test in 17this subsection. For watercraft, nautical miles or trip hours 18may be used in lieu of recording miles in determining whether 19the watercraft meets the mileage test in this subsection.20    Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 21contrary, property purchased on or after January 1, 2014 for 22the purpose of being attached to aircraft or watercraft as a 23part thereof qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate 24commerce only if the aircraft or watercraft to which it will be 25attached qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate 26commerce under the test set forth in this subsection (e),   SB1406- 16 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1regardless of when the aircraft or watercraft was purchased. 2Persons who purchased aircraft or watercraft prior to January 31, 2014 shall make an election to use either the trips or 4mileage method and document that election in their books and 5records for the purpose of determining whether property 6purchased on or after January 1, 2014 for the purpose of being 7attached to aircraft or watercraft as a part thereof qualifies 8as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce under this 9subsection (e). 10    (f) The election to use either the trips or mileage method 11made under the provisions of subsections (c), (d), or (e) of 12this Section will remain in effect for the duration of the 13purchaser's ownership of that item. 14(Source: P.A. 100-321, eff. 8-24-17.) 15    Section 15. The Service Occupation Tax Act is amended by 16changing Section 2d as follows: 17    (35 ILCS 115/2d)18    Sec. 2d. Motor vehicles; trailers; use as rolling stock 19definition. 20    (a) (Blank). 21    (b) (Blank).22    (c) This subsection (c) applies to motor vehicles, other 23than limousines, purchased through June 30, 2017. For motor 24vehicles, other than limousines, purchased on or after July 1,   SB1406- 17 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b12017, subsection (d-5) applies. This subsection (c) applies to 2limousines purchased before, on, or after July 1, 2017. "Use 3as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce" in paragraph 4(d-1) of the definition of "sale of service" in Section 2 5occurs for motor vehicles, as defined in Section 1-146 of the 6Illinois Vehicle Code, when during a 12-month period the 7rolling stock has carried persons or property for hire in 8interstate commerce for greater than 50% of its total trips 9for that period or for greater than 50% of its total miles for 10that period. The person claiming the exemption shall make an 11election at the time of purchase to use either the trips or 12mileage method. Persons who purchased motor vehicles prior to 13July 1, 2004 shall make an election to use either the trips or 14mileage method and document that election in their books and 15records. If no election is made under this subsection to use 16the trips or mileage method, the person shall be deemed to have 17chosen the mileage method.18    For purposes of determining qualifying trips or miles, 19motor vehicles that carry persons or property for hire, even 20just between points in Illinois, will be considered used for 21hire in interstate commerce if the motor vehicle transports 22persons whose journeys or property whose shipments originate 23or terminate outside Illinois. The exemption for motor 24vehicles used as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce 25may be claimed only for the following vehicles: (i) motor 26vehicles whose gross vehicle weight rating exceeds 16,000   SB1406- 18 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1pounds; and (ii) limousines, as defined in Section 1-139.1 of 2the Illinois Vehicle Code. Through June 30, 2017, this 3definition applies to all property purchased for the purpose 4of being attached to those motor vehicles as a part thereof. On 5and after July 1, 2017, this definition applies to property 6purchased for the purpose of being attached to limousines as a 7part thereof. 8    (d) For purchases made through June 30, 2017, "use as 9rolling stock moving in interstate commerce" in paragraph 10(d-1) of the definition of "sale of service" in Section 2 11occurs for trailers, as defined in Section 1-209 of the 12Illinois Vehicle Code, semitrailers as defined in Section 131-187 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, and pole trailers as 14defined in Section 1-161 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, when 15during a 12-month period the rolling stock has carried persons 16or property for hire in interstate commerce for greater than 1750% of its total trips for that period or for greater than 50% 18of its total miles for that period. The person claiming the 19exemption for a trailer or trailers that will not be dedicated 20to a motor vehicle or group of motor vehicles shall make an 21election at the time of purchase to use either the trips or 22mileage method. Persons who purchased trailers prior to July 231, 2004 that are not dedicated to a motor vehicle or group of 24motor vehicles shall make an election to use either the trips 25or mileage method and document that election in their books 26and records. If no election is made under this subsection to   SB1406- 19 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1use the trips or mileage method, the person shall be deemed to 2have chosen the mileage method.3    For purposes of determining qualifying trips or miles, 4trailers, semitrailers, or pole trailers that carry property 5for hire, even just between points in Illinois, will be 6considered used for hire in interstate commerce if the 7trailers, semitrailers, or pole trailers transport property 8whose shipments originate or terminate outside Illinois. This 9definition applies to all property purchased for the purpose 10of being attached to those trailers, semitrailers, or pole 11trailers as a part thereof. In lieu of a person providing 12documentation regarding the qualifying use of each individual 13trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer, that person may 14document such qualifying use by providing documentation of the 15following:16        (1) If a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer is 17    dedicated to a motor vehicle that qualifies as rolling 18    stock moving in interstate commerce under subsection (c) 19    of this Section, then that trailer, semitrailer, or pole 20    trailer qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate 21    commerce under this subsection.22        (2) If a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer is 23    dedicated to a group of motor vehicles that all qualify as 24    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce under 25    subsection (c) of this Section, then that trailer, 26    semitrailer, or pole trailer qualifies as rolling stock   SB1406- 20 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1    moving in interstate commerce under this subsection.2        (3) If one or more trailers, semitrailers, or pole 3    trailers are dedicated to a group of motor vehicles and 4    not all of those motor vehicles in that group qualify as 5    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce under 6    subsection (c) of this Section, then the percentage of 7    those trailers, semitrailers, or pole trailers that 8    qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce 9    under this subsection is equal to the percentage of those 10    motor vehicles in that group that qualify as rolling stock 11    moving in interstate commerce under subsection (c) of this 12    Section to which those trailers, semitrailers, or pole 13    trailers are dedicated. However, to determine the 14    qualification for the exemption provided under this item 15    (3), the mathematical application of the qualifying 16    percentage to one or more trailers, semitrailers, or pole 17    trailers under this subpart shall not be allowed as to any 18    fraction of a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer. 19    (d-5) For motor vehicles and trailers purchased on or 20after July 1, 2017, "use as rolling stock moving in interstate 21commerce" means that:22        (1) the motor vehicle or trailer is used to transport 23    persons or property for hire;24        (2) for purposes of the exemption under paragraph 25    (d-1) of the definition of "sale of service" in Section 2, 26    the purchaser who is an owner, lessor, or shipper claiming   SB1406- 21 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1    the exemption certifies that the motor vehicle or trailer 2    will be utilized, from the time of purchase and continuing 3    through the statute of limitations for issuing a notice of 4    tax liability under this Act, by an interstate carrier or 5    carriers for hire who hold, and are required by Federal 6    Motor Carrier Safety Administration regulations to hold, 7    an active USDOT Number with the Carrier Operation listed 8    as "Interstate" and the Operation Classification listed as 9    "authorized for hire", "exempt for hire", or both 10    "authorized for hire" and "exempt for hire"; except that 11    this paragraph (2) does not apply to a motor vehicle or 12    trailer used at an airport to support the operation of an 13    aircraft moving in interstate commerce, as long as (i) in 14    the case of a motor vehicle, the motor vehicle meets 15    paragraphs (1) and (3) of this subsection (d-5) or (ii) in 16    the case of a trailer, the trailer meets paragraph (1) of 17    this subsection (d-5); and18        (3) for motor vehicles, the gross vehicle weight 19    rating exceeds 16,000 pounds.20    The definition of "use as rolling stock moving in 21interstate commerce" in this subsection (d-5) applies to all 22property purchased on or after July 1, 2017 for the purpose of 23being attached to a motor vehicle or trailer as a part thereof, 24regardless of whether the motor vehicle or trailer was 25purchased before, on, or after July 1, 2017.26    If an item ceases to meet requirements (1) through (3)   SB1406- 22 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1under this subsection (d-5), then the tax is imposed on the 2selling price, allowing for a reasonable depreciation for the 3period during which the item qualified for the exemption.4    For purposes of this subsection (d-5):5        "Motor vehicle" excludes limousines, but otherwise 6    means that term as defined in Section 1-146 of the 7    Illinois Vehicle Code.8        "Trailer" means (i) "trailer", as defined in Section 9    1-209 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, (ii) "semitrailer", as 10    defined in Section 1-187 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, and 11    (iii) "pole trailer", as defined in Section 1-161 of the 12    Illinois Vehicle Code. 13    (e) For aircraft purchased on or after January 1, 2014 and 14purchased before January 1, 2025 and for watercraft purchased 15on or after January 1, 2014, "use as rolling stock moving in 16interstate commerce" in paragraph (d-1) of the definition of 17"sale of service" in Section 2 occurs when, during a 12-month 18period, the rolling stock has carried persons or property for 19hire in interstate commerce for greater than 50% of its total 20trips for that period or for greater than 50% of its total 21miles for that period. For aircraft purchased on or after 22January 1, 2025, "use as rolling stock moving in interstate 23commerce" in paragraph (d-1) of the definition of "sale of 24service" in Section 2 occurs when, during a 24-month period, 25the rolling stock has carried persons or property for hire in 26interstate commerce for more than 50% of its total trips for   SB1406- 23 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1that period or for more than 50% of its total miles for that 2period. The person claiming the exemption shall make an 3election at the time of purchase to use either the trips or 4mileage method and document that election in their books and 5records. If no election is made under this subsection to use 6the trips or mileage method, the person shall be deemed to have 7chosen the mileage method. For aircraft, flight hours may be 8used in lieu of recording miles in determining whether the 9aircraft meets the mileage test in this subsection. For 10watercraft, nautical miles or trip hours may be used in lieu of 11recording miles in determining whether the watercraft meets 12the mileage test in this subsection.13    Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 14contrary, property purchased on or after January 1, 2014 for 15the purpose of being attached to aircraft or watercraft as a 16part thereof qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate 17commerce only if the aircraft or watercraft to which it will be 18attached qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate 19commerce under the test set forth in this subsection (e), 20regardless of when the aircraft or watercraft was purchased. 21Persons who purchased aircraft or watercraft prior to January 221, 2014 shall make an election to use either the trips or 23mileage method and document that election in their books and 24records for the purpose of determining whether property 25purchased on or after January 1, 2014 for the purpose of being 26attached to aircraft or watercraft as a part thereof qualifies   SB1406- 24 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce under this 2subsection (e). 3    (f) The election to use either the trips or mileage method 4made under the provisions of subsections (c), (d), or (e) of 5this Section will remain in effect for the duration of the 6purchaser's ownership of that item. 7(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 8    Section 20. The Retailers' Occupation Tax Act is amended 9by changing Section 2-51 as follows: 10    (35 ILCS 120/2-51)11    Sec. 2-51. Motor vehicles; trailers; use as rolling stock 12definition. 13    (a) (Blank). 14    (b) (Blank).15    (c) This subsection (c) applies to motor vehicles, other 16than limousines, purchased through June 30, 2017. For motor 17vehicles, other than limousines, purchased on or after July 1, 182017, subsection (d-5) applies. This subsection (c) applies to 19limousines purchased before, on, or after July 1, 2017. "Use 20as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce" in paragraph 21(13) of Section 2-5 occurs for motor vehicles, as defined in 22Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, when during a 2312-month period the rolling stock has carried persons or 24property for hire in interstate commerce for greater than 50%   SB1406- 25 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1of its total trips for that period or for greater than 50% of 2its total miles for that period. The person claiming the 3exemption shall make an election at the time of purchase to use 4either the trips or mileage method. Persons who purchased 5motor vehicles prior to July 1, 2004 shall make an election to 6use either the trips or mileage method and document that 7election in their books and records. If no election is made 8under this subsection to use the trips or mileage method, the 9person shall be deemed to have chosen the mileage method.10    For purposes of determining qualifying trips or miles, 11motor vehicles that carry persons or property for hire, even 12just between points in Illinois, will be considered used for 13hire in interstate commerce if the motor vehicle transports 14persons whose journeys or property whose shipments originate 15or terminate outside Illinois. The exemption for motor 16vehicles used as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce 17may be claimed only for the following vehicles: (i) motor 18vehicles whose gross vehicle weight rating exceeds 16,000 19pounds; and (ii) limousines, as defined in Section 1-139.1 of 20the Illinois Vehicle Code. Through June 30, 2017, this 21definition applies to all property purchased for the purpose 22of being attached to those motor vehicles as a part thereof. On 23and after July 1, 2017, this definition applies to property 24purchased for the purpose of being attached to limousines as a 25part thereof. 26    (d) For purchases made through June 30, 2017, "use as   SB1406- 26 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1rolling stock moving in interstate commerce" in paragraph (13) 2of Section 2-5 occurs for trailers, as defined in Section 31-209 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, semitrailers as defined in 4Section 1-187 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, and pole trailers 5as defined in Section 1-161 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, when 6during a 12-month period the rolling stock has carried persons 7or property for hire in interstate commerce for greater than 850% of its total trips for that period or for greater than 50% 9of its total miles for that period. The person claiming the 10exemption for a trailer or trailers that will not be dedicated 11to a motor vehicle or group of motor vehicles shall make an 12election at the time of purchase to use either the trips or 13mileage method. Persons who purchased trailers prior to July 141, 2004 that are not dedicated to a motor vehicle or group of 15motor vehicles shall make an election to use either the trips 16or mileage method and document that election in their books 17and records. If no election is made under this subsection to 18use the trips or mileage method, the person shall be deemed to 19have chosen the mileage method.20    For purposes of determining qualifying trips or miles, 21trailers, semitrailers, or pole trailers that carry property 22for hire, even just between points in Illinois, will be 23considered used for hire in interstate commerce if the 24trailers, semitrailers, or pole trailers transport property 25whose shipments originate or terminate outside Illinois. This 26definition applies to all property purchased for the purpose   SB1406- 27 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1of being attached to those trailers, semitrailers, or pole 2trailers as a part thereof. In lieu of a person providing 3documentation regarding the qualifying use of each individual 4trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer, that person may 5document such qualifying use by providing documentation of the 6following:7        (1) If a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer is 8    dedicated to a motor vehicle that qualifies as rolling 9    stock moving in interstate commerce under subsection (c) 10    of this Section, then that trailer, semitrailer, or pole 11    trailer qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate 12    commerce under this subsection.13        (2) If a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer is 14    dedicated to a group of motor vehicles that all qualify as 15    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce under 16    subsection (c) of this Section, then that trailer, 17    semitrailer, or pole trailer qualifies as rolling stock 18    moving in interstate commerce under this subsection.19        (3) If one or more trailers, semitrailers, or pole 20    trailers are dedicated to a group of motor vehicles and 21    not all of those motor vehicles in that group qualify as 22    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce under 23    subsection (c) of this Section, then the percentage of 24    those trailers, semitrailers, or pole trailers that 25    qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce 26    under this subsection is equal to the percentage of those   SB1406- 28 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1    motor vehicles in that group that qualify as rolling stock 2    moving in interstate commerce under subsection (c) of this 3    Section to which those trailers, semitrailers, or pole 4    trailers are dedicated. However, to determine the 5    qualification for the exemption provided under this item 6    (3), the mathematical application of the qualifying 7    percentage to one or more trailers, semitrailers, or pole 8    trailers under this subpart shall not be allowed as to any 9    fraction of a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer. 10    (d-5) For motor vehicles and trailers purchased on or 11after July 1, 2017, "use as rolling stock moving in interstate 12commerce" means that:13        (1) the motor vehicle or trailer is used to transport 14    persons or property for hire;15        (2) for purposes of the exemption under paragraph (13) 16    of Section 2-5, the purchaser who is an owner, lessor, or 17    shipper claiming the exemption certifies that the motor 18    vehicle or trailer will be utilized, from the time of 19    purchase and continuing through the statute of limitations 20    for issuing a notice of tax liability under this Act, by an 21    interstate carrier or carriers for hire who hold, and are 22    required by Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration 23    regulations to hold, an active USDOT Number with the 24    Carrier Operation listed as "Interstate" and the Operation 25    Classification listed as "authorized for hire", "exempt 26    for hire", or both "authorized for hire" and "exempt for   SB1406- 29 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1    hire"; except that this paragraph (2) does not apply to a 2    motor vehicle or trailer used at an airport to support the 3    operation of an aircraft moving in interstate commerce, as 4    long as (i) in the case of a motor vehicle, the motor 5    vehicle meets paragraphs (1) and (3) of this subsection 6    (d-5) or (ii) in the case of a trailer, the trailer meets 7    paragraph (1) of this subsection (d-5); and8        (3) for motor vehicles, the gross vehicle weight 9    rating exceeds 16,000 pounds.10    The definition of "use as rolling stock moving in 11interstate commerce" in this subsection (d-5) applies to all 12property purchased on or after July 1, 2017 for the purpose of 13being attached to a motor vehicle or trailer as a part thereof, 14regardless of whether the motor vehicle or trailer was 15purchased before, on, or after July 1, 2017.16    If an item ceases to meet requirements (1) through (3) 17under this subsection (d-5), then the tax is imposed on the 18selling price, allowing for a reasonable depreciation for the 19period during which the item qualified for the exemption.20    For purposes of this subsection (d-5):21        "Motor vehicle" excludes limousines, but otherwise 22    means that term as defined in Section 1-146 of the 23    Illinois Vehicle Code.24        "Trailer" means (i) "trailer", as defined in Section 25    1-209 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, (ii) "semitrailer", as 26    defined in Section 1-187 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, and   SB1406- 30 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1    (iii) "pole trailer", as defined in Section 1-161 of the 2    Illinois Vehicle Code. 3    (e) For aircraft purchased on or after January 1, 2014 and 4purchased before January 1, 2025 and for watercraft purchased 5on or after January 1, 2014, "use as rolling stock moving in 6interstate commerce" in paragraph (13) of Section 2-5 occurs 7when, during a 12-month period, the rolling stock has carried 8persons or property for hire in interstate commerce for 9greater than 50% of its total trips for that period or for 10greater than 50% of its total miles for that period. For 11aircraft purchased on or after January 1, 2025, "use as 12rolling stock moving in interstate commerce" in paragraph (13) 13of Section 2-5 occurs when, during a 24-month period, the 14rolling stock has carried persons or property for hire in 15interstate commerce for more than 50% of its total trips for 16that period or for more than 50% of its total miles for that 17period. The person claiming the exemption shall make an 18election at the time of purchase to use either the trips or 19mileage method and document that election in their books and 20records. If no election is made under this subsection to use 21the trips or mileage method, the person shall be deemed to have 22chosen the mileage method. For aircraft, flight hours may be 23used in lieu of recording miles in determining whether the 24aircraft meets the mileage test in this subsection. For 25watercraft, nautical miles or trip hours may be used in lieu of 26recording miles in determining whether the watercraft meets   SB1406- 31 -LRB104 03813 HLH 13837 b1the mileage test in this subsection.2    Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 3contrary, property purchased on or after January 1, 2014 for 4the purpose of being attached to aircraft or watercraft as a 5part thereof qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate 6commerce only if the aircraft or watercraft to which it will be 7attached qualifies as rolling stock moving in interstate 8commerce under the test set forth in this subsection (e), 9regardless of when the aircraft or watercraft was purchased. 10Persons who purchased aircraft or watercraft prior to January 111, 2014 shall make an election to use either the trips or 12mileage method and document that election in their books and 13records for the purpose of determining whether property 14purchased on or after January 1, 2014 for the purpose of being 15attached to aircraft or watercraft as a part thereof qualifies 16as rolling stock moving in interstate commerce under this 17subsection (e). 18    (f) The election to use either the trips or mileage method 19made under the provisions of subsections (c), (d), or (e) of 20this Section will remain in effect for the duration of the 21purchaser's ownership of that item. 22(Source: P.A. 100-321, eff. 8-24-17.) 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.